California, session 20252026, SB746.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California’s rural landscapes and communities have been ground zero for large-scale environmental and economic devastation during the past decades by virtue of the Angora, Caldor, Camp, August Complex, Dixie, Palisades, Eaton, and Hughes Fires.(b) Aging infrastructures combined with insufficient resources to prepare for adequate wildfire response has left many rural communities at high risk for future unchecked fire activity.(c) Postfire costs associated with the destruction inflicted upon communities, such as Grizzly Flats, Paradise, Greenville, Malibu, Pacific Palisades, Altadena, and the County of Los Angeles, have been estimated to be in the tens of billions of dollars.(d) While California is taking the necessary actions to mitigate the intensity and frequency of fire in the rural parts of the state, local governments need state support for necessary investments to prepare for fire.SEC. 2. Section 13198.5 is added to the Water Code, to read:13198.5. (a) There is hereby established in the department the Urban Water Community Drought Relief program to provide grants for interim or immediate drought relief to secure the future of California’s water supply to address immediate impacts on human health and safety, to protect fish and wildlife resources, and to provide water to urban communities that lose or are threatened with the loss or contamination of water supplies.(b) A project funded by this program shall benefit a community supplied by an urban water supplier, as defined in Section 10617.(c) The program, upon appropriation for these purposes after the operative date of this section, may fund projects that provide benefits in addition to drought relief, including, but not limited to, all of the following projects:(1) Projects that reduce the risk of wildfire for entire neighborhoods and communities through water delivery system improvements for fire suppression purposes in high fire hazard severity zone communities or very high fire hazard severity zone communities, as designated by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code or by a local agency pursuant to Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51175) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.(2) Projects that provide water deliveries such as hauled water, temporary community water tanks, bottled water, or water vending machines.(3) Projects that construct infrastructure such as emergency water interties, drilling or rehabilitating new wells, or the installation of permanent water infrastructure.(4) Projects that rescue, protect, and relocate fish and wildlife.(5) Projects that support water conservation activities, including, but not limited to, education, fixture replacement incentives and rebate programs, and turf replacement with drought tolerant landscaping.(6) Projects to repair, replace, restore, or rehabilitate facilities that convey source water to a water treatment plant to preserve water supply availability for water distribution systems.SEC. 3. Section 13198.51 is added to the Water Code, to read:13198.51. (a) There is hereby established in the department the Small Community Drought Relief program to provide grants for interim or immediate drought relief to address impacts on human health and safety and impacts on fish and wildlife resources, and to provide water to persons or small or rural communities that lose or are threatened with the loss or contamination of water supplies.(b) A project funded by this program shall benefit a community not supplied by an urban water supplier, as defined in Section 10617.(c) The program, upon appropriation for its purposes after the operative date of this section, may fund projects that provide benefits in addition to drought relief, including, but not limited to, all of the following projects:(1) Projects that reduce the risk of wildfire for entire neighborhoods and communities through water delivery system improvements for fire suppression purposes in high fire hazard severity zone communities or very high fire hazard severity zone communities, as designated by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code or by a local agency pursuant to Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51175) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.(2) Projects that provide water deliveries such as hauled water, temporary community water tanks, bottled water, or water vending machines.(3) Projects that construct infrastructure such as emergency water interties, drilling or rehabilitating new wells, or the installation of permanent water infrastructure.(4) Projects that rescue, protect, and relocate fish and wildlife.